Utah statutes.
10-8-78.   Official bonds and reports.

They may require all municipal officers and agents, elected or appointed, to give bond and security for the faithful performance of their duties, and require from every officer of the city at any time a report in detail of all transactions in his office or any matters connected therewith.



No Change Since 1953

